Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska29-4205
Audiovisual court appearance; procedures.

In a proceeding in which an audiovisual court appearance is made:

(1) Facsimile signatures or electronically reproduced signatures are acceptable for purposes of releasing the detainee or prisoner from custody; however, actual signed copies of the release documents must be promptly filed with the court and the detainee or prisoner must promptly be provided with a copy of all documents which the detainee or prisoner signs;

(2) The record of the court reporting personnel shall be the official record of the proceeding; and

(3) On motion of the detainee or prisoner or the prosecuting attorney or in the court's discretion, the court may terminate an audiovisual appearance and require an appearance by the detainee or prisoner.

Laws 1999, LB 623, § 5;

Laws 2006, LB 1115, § 24;

Laws 2018, LB983, § 1.